North Carolina, session 2025, SB389.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-562.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Authority. – The State Education Assistance Authority.
(2) Division. – The Division of Nonpublic Education, Department of
Administration.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(a), effective July 1, 2023.
(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article
25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is
eligible to attend the following school year if the principal, or
equivalent, of the school in which the child seeks to enroll finds that
the student meets the requirements established by the Authority
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority.
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time
student taking at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public
agency at public expense.
(3c) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(a), effective July 1, 2023.
(3d) Home school. – A nonpublic school that meets the requirements of Part 3 of
Article 39 of this Chapter, as identified by the Division.
(4) Local school administrative unit. – A local school administrative unit, charter
school, or regional school.
(5) Nonpublic school. – A school that meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2
Part 1, Part 2, or Part 3 of this Article as identified by the Division.
(5c) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(a), effective July 1, 2023.
(5d) Private school. – A school that meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of
this Article as identified by the Division.
*S389-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5e) Reserve. – The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve established
under G.S. 115C-562.8.
(6) Scholarship grants. – Grants awarded annually by the Authority to eligible
students."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full- or
part-time basis. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be made
available on the Authority's Web site. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin awarding
scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following order:
(1) Eligible students who received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to
the school year for which the students are applying.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.residing in households
with an income level not in excess of the amount required for the student to
qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.residing in households
with an income level between the amount required for the student to qualify
for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of two
hundred percent (200%) of that amount.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.residing in households
with an income level of between two hundred percent (200%) of the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of four hundred fifty percent (450%) of that
amount.
(5) All other students.
…
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
(1) For students enrolled in private schools:
(1)a. For students residing in households with an income level not in excess
of the amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or
reduced-price lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount
of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the average State per pupil
allocation for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2)b. For students residing in households with an income level between the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or
reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of two hundred percent
(200%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an amount of up
to ninety percent (90%) of the average State per pupil allocation for
average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(3)c. For students residing in households with an income level of between
two hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to
qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in
excess of four hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year
per eligible student, an amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the
average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the
prior fiscal year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 389-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4)d. For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to
forty-five percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for
average daily membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student
qualifies for a higher amount under this subsection.
(2) For students enrolled in home schools, per year per eligible student, an amount
of up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the average State per pupil allocation
for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(b3) Tuition Scholarship grant funds may be used for tuition and fees for a nonpublic
school of a private school and required costs of a home school. Tuition and fees of a private
school may include tuition and fees for books, transportation, equipment, or other items required
by the nonpublic private school. Required costs of a home school include costs for books,
equipment, and other required items, but do not include tuition, fees, or transportation.
(b4) No scholarship grant shall exceed the required tuition and fees for the private school
the eligible student will attend. No scholarship grant shall exceed, per year per eligible student,
any of the following:
(1) For students in private school, an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%)
of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the
prior fiscal year, and no scholarship grant shall exceed the required tuition and
fees for the nonpublic school the eligible student will attend.year.
(2) For students in home school, an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%)
of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the
prior fiscal year.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-562.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.4. Identification of nonpublic schools and distribution of scholarship grant
information.
(a) The Division shall provide annually by December 31 to the Authority a list of all
nonpublic schools operating in the State that meet both of the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of
this Article and State and all nonpublic schools operating in the State that meet the requirements
of G.S. 115C-562.5(a)(8). The Division shall notify the Authority of any schools included in the
list that the Division has determined to be ineligible within five business days of the
determination of ineligibility. The Division shall create, in collaboration with the Authority, a
unique identifier for each nonpublic school and provide the unique identifiers to the Authority
for all nonpublic schools that are registered with the Division.
…."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-562.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.5. Obligations of nonpublic schools accepting eligible students receiving
scholarship grants.
(a) A nonpublic school that accepts eligible students receiving scholarship grants shall
comply with the following:comply with the requirements of this section as follows:
(1) Provide A nonpublic school shall provide to the Authority documentation for
the expenses of an eligible student as follows:
a. The required tuition and fees charged to the student by the nonpublic
private school.
b. The required costs of the student in a home school.
(2) Provide A private school shall provide to the Authority a criminal background
check conducted for the staff member with the highest decision-making
authority, as defined by the bylaws, articles of incorporation, or other
governing document. Information provided to the Authority in accordance
with this subdivision is privileged information and is not a public record but
is for the exclusive use of the Authority.
Senate Bill 389-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Provide A private school shall provide to the parent or guardian of an eligible
student, whose tuition and fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship
grant, an annual written explanation of the student's progress, including the
student's scores on standardized achievement tests.
(4) Administer, A nonpublic school shall administer, at least once in each school
year, tests as provided in this subdivision. Test performance data shall be
submitted to the Authority by July 15 of each year. Test performance data
reported to the Authority under this subdivision is not a public record under
Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Tests shall be administered to all eligible
students enrolled in grades three and higher whose tuition and fees are paid in
whole or in part with a scholarship grant as follows:
a. The nationally standardized test designated by the Authority in grades
three and eight.
b. The ACT in grade 11.
c. A nationally standardized test or other nationally standardized
equivalent measurement selected by the chief administrative officer of
the nonpublic school private school or parent of the home school in all
other grades four and higher. For grades four through seven, the
nationally standardized test or other equivalent measurement selected
must measure achievement in the areas of English grammar, reading,
spelling, and mathematics. For grades nine, 10, and 12, the nationally
standardized test or other equivalent measurement selected must
measure either (i) achievement in the areas of English grammar,
reading, spelling, and mathematics or (ii) competencies in the verbal
and quantitative areas.
(5) Provide A nonpublic school shall provide to the Authority graduation rates of
the students receiving scholarship grants in a manner consistent with
nationally recognized standards.
(6) Contract A private school shall contract with a certified public accountant to
perform a financial review, consistent with generally accepted methods of
accounting or any other comprehensive basis of accounting recognized by the
American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA) for each school
year in which the school enrolls 70 or more students receiving scholarship
grants or scholarship funds awarded by the Authority.
(7) Maintain A nonpublic school shall maintain a school facility or home within
the State where in-person instruction is provided. This subdivision does not
prohibit a school from offering remote-only courses of instruction in addition
to in-person instruction.
(8) Provide A nonpublic school shall provide the following information annually
to the Division:
a. Name and address of the school, including physical location address.
A school with more than one physical location shall establish a
separate notice of intent for each physical location and shall provide
all information required by this subdivision for each physical location.
b. The name of the owners and chief administrator.administrator or of the
parent or parents providing instruction.
c. Number of students in attendance at the school as of October 1.
(b) A nonpublic private school that accepts students receiving scholarship grants shall
not require any additional fees based on the status of the student as a scholarship grant recipient.
Page 4 Senate Bill 389-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) A nonpublic private school enrolling more than 25 students in any grade whose tuition
and fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant shall provide and retain information
on student test performance in each grade with more than 25 students, as follows:
(1) Report to the Authority on the aggregate standardized test performance of
eligible students in grades three, eight, and 11. Aggregate test performance
data reported to the Authority which does not contain personally identifiable
student data shall be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
Test performance data may be shared with public or private institutions of
higher education located in North Carolina and shall be provided to an
independent research organization selected by the Authority for research
purposes as permitted by the Federal Education Rights and Privacy Act, 20
U.S.C. § 1232g.
(2) Retain standardized test performance data for eligible students in all other
grades and annually certify to the Authority compliance with the requirements
of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section.
(c1) A nonpublic school shall not discriminate with respect to the categories listed in 42
U.S.C. § 2000d, as that statute read on January 1, 2014.
(d) If the Authority determines that a nonpublic school is not in compliance with the
requirements of this section, the nonpublic school shall be ineligible to receive future scholarship
funds. The nonpublic A private school shall notify the parent or guardian of any enrolled student
receiving a scholarship grant that the nonpublic private school is no longer eligible to receive
future scholarship grants. The Authority shall establish by rule a process for a nonpublic school
to appeal for reconsideration of eligibility after one year. To ensure compliance, the Board of
Directors of the Authority shall review the criminal history provided under subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of this section to ensure that the person has not been convicted of any crime listed
in G.S. 115C-332. The Board shall determine through this review whether the nonpublic private
school is noncompliant with this section. The Board shall make written findings with regard to
how the criminal history information was used when making the compliance determination. The
Board of Directors may delegate any of the duties in this subsection to the Executive Director of
the Authority. As part of its review, the Board shall determine whether the results indicate that
the staff member has any of the following disqualifying characteristics:
(1) Poses a threat to the physical safety of students or personnel.
(2) Demonstrates that he or she does not have the integrity or honesty to fulfill his
or her duties in overseeing State funds and the requirements of the scholarship
grant program.
(3) Has not fully satisfied the criminal sentencing obligations imposed following
his or her conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(e) If a nonpublic school terminates operation during the school's regular schedule and
fails to (i) report the date of the closure to the Division within 14 days and (ii) return funds owed
to the Authority in a timely manner for students who received scholarship grants, any other
nonpublic school opened during that school year or subsequent school years by an owner or chief
administrator owner, chief administrator, or parent listed in the report submitted to the Division
under subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of this section for that closed school shall be ineligible to
receive scholarship grants until such time the Authority determines the obligation to return those
funds has been satisfied."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-562.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.6. Scholarship endorsement.
The Authority shall remit, at least two times each school year, scholarship grant funds
awarded to eligible students to the nonpublic school school. Scholarship grant funds awarded to
eligible students to a private school shall be remitted for endorsement by at least one of the
student's parents or guardians. The parent or guardian shall restrictively endorse the scholarship
Senate Bill 389-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
grant funds awarded to the eligible student for deposit into the account of the nonpublic private
school to the credit of the eligible student. The parent or guardian shall not designate any entity
or individual associated with the nonpublic private school as the parent's attorney-in-fact to
endorse the scholarship grant funds. A parent's or guardian's failure to comply with this section
shall result in forfeit of the scholarship grant. A scholarship grant forfeited for failure to comply
with this section shall be returned to the Authority to be awarded to another student."
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Opportunity
Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve the following amounts in additional recurring dollars for each
of the following fiscal years:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2025-2026 $220,000,000
2026-2027 $240,000,000
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-562.8(b), as amended by Section 6.4(c) of S.L. 2024-55,
reads as rewritten:
"(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each fiscal
year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2017-2018 $44,840,000
2018-2019 $54,840,000
2019-2020 $64,840,000
2020-2021 $74,840,000
2021-2022 $84,840,000
2022-2023 $94,840,000
2023-2024 $176,540,000
2024-2025 $191,540,000
2025-2026 $625,000,000
2026-2027 $675,000,000
2027-2028 $700,000,000$960,000,000
2028-2029 $725,000,000$1,000,000,000
2029-2030 $750,000,000$1,025,000,000
2030-2031 $775,000,000$1,050,000,000
2031-2032 $800,000,000$1,075,000,000
For the 2032-2033 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars ($825,000,000)
one billion one hundred million dollars ($1,100,000,000) to be used for the purposes set forth in
this section. When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in this subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount
specified in this subsection for that fiscal year."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to applications
for scholarship grants beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.
Page 6 Senate Bill 389-First Edition